Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1646.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2.2(d) of the act of June 19, 1931 (P.L.589, No.202), referred to as the Barbers' License Law, is amended to read:Section 2.2. * * *(d) [Six members of the board shall constitute a quorum.] A majority of the members of the board who are lawfully serving on the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the business of the board.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.123456789101112131415161718192021